Utah statutes.
3-1-13.3.   General standards of conduct for directors and officers.
(1)  A director shall perform his duties as a director, and as a member of a
committee, and each officer with discretionary authority shall perform his
duties under that authority:
(a)  in good faith;
(b)  with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a similar position would
exercise under similar circumstances; and
(c)  in a manner the director or officer reasonably believes to be in the best
interests of the association.
(2)  In performing his duties, a director or officer may rely on information,
opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other
financial data, if prepared or presented by:
(a)  one or more officers or employees of the association whom the director or
officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters
presented;
(b)  legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the
director or officer reasonably believes are within the person's professional
or expert competence; or
(c)  in the case of a director, a committee of the board of directors of which
he is not a member, if the director reasonably believes the committee merits
confidence.
(3)  A director or officer is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge
that makes reliance otherwise permitted by Subsection (2) unwarranted.
(4)  A director or officer is not liable to the association, its members, or
any conservator or receiver, or any assignee or successor-in-interest thereof,
for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as an officer or
director unless:
(a)  the director or officer has breached or failed to perform the duties of
the office in compliance with this section; and
(b)  the breach or failure to perform constitutes gross negligence, willful
misconduct, or intentional infliction of harm on the association or the
members.
